Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2955
Animal Health and Disease Control Act or Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act; embargo or importation order; required herd management plan; violations; penalties.

(1) Any person who imports livestock or causes livestock to be imported into the State of Nebraska in violation of an embargo or importation order issued by the State Veterinarian shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(2) Any person who violates any provision of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, or any rules and regulations duly adopted and promulgated thereunder, for which no other criminal penalty is provided by such acts, shall be deemed guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(3) An owner or custodian of an affected animal, herd, or flock or affected premises who fails to develop a required herd management plan or who fails to follow such a plan is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 55.
November 14, 2020
Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.